Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 2 Abstractors

Cross references. —

As to licensing provisions generally, see ch. 1 of this title.

§ 33-2-101.
Abstractor to have complete set of abstracts and give bond.

Hereafter no person, company or corporation shall engage in or carry on the business of making or furnishing abstracts of title to any real estate within this state, without first having a full and complete set of abstract records of title of all the real estate situated in the county in which such business is carried on; or, in case such abstract business is limited to furnishing abstracts of real estate situated in an incorporated city or town, in such case a complete set of abstracts of all real estate in such city or town shall be kept, and such person, company or corporation shall also first enter into bond to the people of the state of Wyoming for the use of any person who shall sustain loss or damage by reason of the failure of any such person, company or corporation in the performance of his or their duty as such abstractor. Said bond shall be in the penal sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), with sufficient sureties, to be approved by and filed with the county clerk of such county, and conditioned for the faithful performance of his or their duty as such abstractor.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 41, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2524; C.S. 1910, § 3437; C.S. 1920, § 4354; R.S. 1931, § 1-101; C.S. 1945, § 66-601; W.S. 1957, § 33-12.

Photographic reproductions of chain of title instruments are not abstracts. —

The definitions of abstract, legal and general, do not appear to have changed over the years, but the practice has developed of making photographic reproductions of the entire instruments comprising the chain of title. These documents may not properly be held to be abstracts, as that term was used in 1890 when the present statute was enacted. Title Guar. Co. of Wyo., Inc. v. Belt, 539 P.2d 357,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1975).

Strict construction required. —

Sections

33-2-101

and

33-2-102

, imposing restrictions upon the business of “furnishing abstracts of title” and imposing a fine of $500.00 for each and every failure to comply with the act, are penal in nature, subject to strict construction. Title Guar. Co. of Wyo., Inc. v. Belt, 539 P.2d 357,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1975).

Law reviews. —

For a comment, “Abstractor's Liability in Examination of Title,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 184.

For a comment, “The Presumption of Death Problem in Title Examination,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 189.

For a comment, “Precautions of the Title Examiner in Relation to Federal Tax Liens,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 195.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Duty and liability of abstractor to employer respecting matters to be included in abstract, 28 ALR2d 891.

Liability of one preparing abstract of title for deficiencies therein to one other than person directly contracting for abstract, 34 ALR3d 1122.

Negligence in preparing abstract of title as ground of liability to one other than person ordering abstract, 50 ALR4th 314.

§ 33-2-102.
Penalty.

Any person, company or corporation who shall carry on or attempt to carry on any business mentioned in section one of this act [§

33-2-101

] and who shall fail, neglect or refuse to fully comply with the provisions of this act [§§

33-2-101

,

33-2-102

] shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined in the sum of five hundred dollars ($500.00), for each and every offense.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 41, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 2525; C.S. 1910, § 3438; C.S. 1920, § 4355; R.S. 1931, § 1-102; C.S. 1945, § 66-602; W.S. 1957, § 33-13.

Photographic reproductions of chain of title instruments are not abstracts. —

The definitions of abstract, legal and general, do not appear to have changed over the years, but the practice has developed of making photographic reproductions of the entire instruments comprising the chain of title. These documents may not properly be held to be abstracts, as that term was used in 1890 when the present statute was enacted. Title Guar. Co. of Wyo., Inc. v. Belt, 539 P.2d 357,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1975).

Strict construction required. —

Sections

33-2-101

and

33-2-102

, imposing restrictions upon the business of “furnishing abstracts of title” and imposing a fine of $500.00 for each and every failure to comply with the act, are penal in nature, subject to strict construction. Title Guar. Co. of Wyo., Inc. v. Belt, 539 P.2d 357,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1975).